Illinois, session 104th, HB5126.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by changing 5Sections 17-9, 18-5, and 19A-35 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/17-9)  (from Ch. 46, par. 17-9)7    Sec. 17-9. Any person desiring to vote shall give his name 8and, if required to do so, his residence to the judges of 9election, one of whom shall thereupon announce the same in a 10loud and distinct tone of voice, clear, and audible; the 11judges of elections shall check each application for ballot 12against the list of voters registered in that precinct to whom 13grace period, vote by mail, or early ballots have been issued 14for that election, which shall be provided by the election 15authority and which list shall be available for inspection by 16pollwatchers. A voter applying to vote in the precinct on 17election day whose name appears on the list as having been 18issued a grace period, vote by mail, or early ballot shall not 19be permitted to vote in the precinct, except that a voter to 20whom a vote by mail ballot was issued may vote in the precinct 21if the voter submits to the election judges that vote by mail 22ballot for cancellation. If the voter is unable to submit the 23vote by mail ballot, it shall be sufficient for the voter to   HB5126- 2 -LRB104 18502 SPS 31944 b1submit to the election judges (i) a portion of the vote by mail 2ballot if the vote by mail ballot was torn or mutilated or (ii) 3an affidavit executed before the election judges specifying 4that (A) the voter never received a vote by mail ballot, or (B) 5the voter completed and returned a vote by mail ballot and was 6informed that the election authority did not receive that vote 7by mail ballot, or (C) the voter received a vote by mail 8ballot, but the vote by mail ballot was misplaced or 9destroyed, and was unable to bring the vote by mail ballot to 10the polling place. All applicable provisions of Articles 4, 5 11or 6 shall be complied with and if such name is found on the 12register of voters by the officer having charge thereof, he 13shall likewise repeat said name, and the voter shall be 14allowed to enter within the proximity of the voting booths, as 15above provided. One of the judges shall give the voter one, and 16only one of each ballot to be voted at the election, on the 17back of which ballots such judge shall indorse his initials in 18such manner that they may be seen when each such ballot is 19properly folded, and the voter's name shall be immediately 20checked on the register list. In those election jurisdictions 21where perforated ballot cards are utilized of the type on 22which write-in votes can be cast above the perforation, the 23election authority shall provide a space both above and below 24the perforation for the judge's initials, and the judge shall 25endorse his or her initials in both spaces. Whenever a 26proposal for a constitutional amendment or for the calling of   HB5126- 3 -LRB104 18502 SPS 31944 b1a constitutional convention is to be voted upon at the 2election, the separate blue ballot or ballots pertaining 3thereto shall, when being handed to the voter, be placed on top 4of the other ballots to be voted at the election in such manner 5that the legend appearing on the back thereof, as prescribed 6in Section 16-6 of this Act, shall be plainly visible to the 7voter. At all elections, when a registry may be required, if 8the name of any person so desiring to vote at such election is 9not found on the register of voters, he or she shall not 10receive a ballot until he or she shall have complied with the 11law prescribing the manner and conditions of voting by 12unregistered voters. If any person desiring to vote at any 13election shall be challenged, he or she shall not receive a 14ballot until he or she shall have established his right to vote 15in the manner provided hereinafter; and if he or she shall be 16challenged after he has received his ballot, he shall not be 17permitted to vote until he or she has fully complied with such 18requirements of the law upon being challenged. Besides the 19election officer, not more than 2 voters in excess of the whole 20number of voting booths provided shall be allowed within the 21proximity of the voting booths at one time. The provisions of 22this Act, so far as they require the registration of voters as 23a condition to their being allowed to vote shall not apply to 24persons otherwise entitled to vote, who are, at the time of the 25election, or at any time within 60 days prior to such election 26have been engaged in the military or naval service of the   HB5126- 4 -LRB104 18502 SPS 31944 b1United States, and who appear personally at the polling place 2on election day and produce to the judges of election 3satisfactory evidence thereof, but such persons, if otherwise 4qualified to vote, shall be permitted to vote at such election 5without previous registration. 6    All such persons shall also make an affidavit which shall 7be in substantially the following form: 8State of Illinois,) 9                  ) ss. 10County of ........) 11............... Precinct   .......... Ward12    I, ...., do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I am a citizen 13of the United States, of the age of 18 years or over, and that 14within the past 60 days prior to the date of this election at 15which I am applying to vote, I have been engaged in the .... 16(military or naval) service of the United States; and I am 17qualified to vote under and by virtue of the Constitution and 18laws of the State of Illinois, and that I am a legally 19qualified voter of this precinct and ward except that I have, 20because of such service, been unable to register as a voter; 21that I now reside at .... (insert street and number, if any) in 22this precinct and ward; that I have maintained a legal 23residence in this precinct and ward for 30 days and in this 24State 30 days next preceding this election. 25.........................26    Subscribed and sworn to before me on (insert date).   HB5126- 5 -LRB104 18502 SPS 31944 b1.........................2Judge of Election. 3    The affidavit of any such person shall be supported by the 4affidavit of a resident and qualified voter of any such 5precinct and ward, which affidavit shall be in substantially 6the following form: 7State of Illinois,) 8                  ) ss. 9County of ........) 10........... Precinct   ........... Ward11    I, ...., do solemnly swear (or affirm), that I am a 12resident of this precinct and ward and entitled to vote at this 13election; that I am acquainted with .... (name of the 14applicant); that I verily believe him to be an actual bona fide 15resident of this precinct and ward and that I verily believe 16that he or she has maintained a legal residence therein 30 days 17and in this State 30 days next preceding this election. 18.........................19    Subscribed and sworn to before me on (insert date). 20.........................21Judge of Election. 22    All affidavits made under the provisions of this Section 23shall be enclosed in a separate envelope securely sealed, and 24shall be transmitted with the returns of the elections to the   HB5126- 6 -LRB104 18502 SPS 31944 b1county clerk or to the board of election commissioners, who 2shall preserve the said affidavits for the period of 6 months, 3during which period such affidavits shall be deemed public 4records and shall be freely open to examination as such. 5(Source: P.A. 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15.) 6    (10 ILCS 5/18-5)  (from Ch. 46, par. 18-5)7    Sec. 18-5. Any person desiring to vote and whose name is 8found upon the register of voters by the person having charge 9thereof, shall then be questioned by one of the judges as to 10his nativity, his term of residence at present address, 11precinct, State and United States, his age, whether 12naturalized and if so the date of naturalization papers and 13court from which secured, and he shall be asked to state his 14residence when last previously registered and the date of the 15election for which he then registered. The judges of elections 16shall check each application for ballot against the list of 17voters registered in that precinct to whom grace period, vote 18by mail, and early ballots have been issued for that election, 19which shall be provided by the election authority and which 20list shall be available for inspection by pollwatchers. A 21voter applying to vote in the precinct on election day whose 22name appears on the list as having been issued a grace period, 23vote by mail, or early ballot shall not be permitted to vote in 24the precinct, except that a voter to whom a vote by mail ballot 25was issued may vote in the precinct if the voter submits to the   HB5126- 7 -LRB104 18502 SPS 31944 b1election judges that vote by mail ballot for cancellation. If 2the voter is unable to submit the vote by mail ballot, it shall 3be sufficient for the voter to submit to the election judges 4(i) a portion of the vote by mail ballot if the vote by mail 5ballot was torn or mutilated or (ii) an affidavit executed 6before the election judges specifying that (A) the voter never 7received a vote by mail ballot, or (B) the voter completed and 8returned a vote by mail ballot and was informed that the 9election authority did not receive that vote by mail ballot, 10or (C) the voter received a vote by mail ballot, but the vote 11by mail ballot was misplaced or destroyed, so that the voter 12was unable to bring the vote by mail ballot to the polling 13place. If such person so registered shall be challenged as 14disqualified, the party challenging shall assign his reasons 15therefor, and thereupon one of the judges shall administer to 16him an oath to answer questions, and if he shall take the oath 17he shall then be questioned by the judge or judges touching 18such cause of challenge, and touching any other cause of 19disqualification. And he may also be questioned by the person 20challenging him in regard to his qualifications and identity. 21But if a majority of the judges are of the opinion that he is 22the person so registered and a qualified voter, his vote shall 23then be received accordingly. But if his vote be rejected by 24such judges, such person may afterward produce and deliver an 25affidavit to such judges, subscribed and sworn to by him 26before one of the judges, in which it shall be stated how long   HB5126- 8 -LRB104 18502 SPS 31944 b1he has resided in such precinct, and state; that he is a 2citizen of the United States, and is a duly qualified voter in 3such precinct, and that he is the identical person so 4registered. In addition to such an affidavit, the person so 5challenged shall provide to the judges of election proof of 6residence by producing 2 forms of identification showing the 7person's current residence address, provided that such 8identification may include a lease or contract for a residence 9and not more than one piece of mail addressed to the person at 10his current residence address and postmarked not earlier than 1130 days prior to the date of the election, or the person shall 12procure a witness personally known to the judges of election, 13and resident in the precinct (or district), or who shall be 14proved by some legal voter of such precinct or district, known 15to the judges to be such, who shall take the oath following, 16viz: 17    I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I am a resident of 18this election precinct (or district), and entitled to vote at 19this election, and that I have been a resident of this State 20for 30 days last past, and am well acquainted with the person 21whose vote is now offered; that he is an actual and bona fide 22resident of this election precinct (or district), and has 23resided herein 30 days, and as I verily believe, in this State, 2430 days next preceding this election. 25    The oath in each case may be administered by one of the 26judges of election, or by any officer, resident in the   HB5126- 9 -LRB104 18502 SPS 31944 b1precinct or district, authorized by law to administer oaths. 2Also supported by an affidavit by a registered voter residing 3in such precinct, stating his own residence, and that he knows 4such person; and that he does reside at the place mentioned and 5has resided in such precinct and state for the length of time 6as stated by such person, which shall be subscribed and sworn 7to in the same way. For purposes of this Section, the 8submission of a photo identification issued by a college or 9university, accompanied by either (i) a copy of the 10applicant's contract or lease for a residence or (ii) one 11piece of mail addressed to the person at his or her current 12residence address and postmarked not earlier than 30 days 13prior to the date of the election, shall be sufficient to 14establish proof of residence. Whereupon the vote of such 15person shall be received, and entered as other votes. But such 16judges, having charge of such registers, shall state in their 17respective books the facts in such case, and the affidavits, 18so delivered to the judges, shall be preserved and returned to 19the office of the commissioners of election. Blank affidavits 20of the character aforesaid shall be sent out to the judges of 21all the precincts, and the judges of election shall furnish 22the same on demand and administer the oaths without criticism. 23Such oaths, if administered by any other officer than such 24judge of election, shall not be received. Whenever a proposal 25for a constitutional amendment or for the calling of a 26constitutional convention is to be voted upon at the election,   HB5126- 10 -LRB104 18502 SPS 31944 b1the separate blue ballot or ballots pertaining thereto shall 2be placed on top of the other ballots to be voted at the 3election in such manner that the legend appearing on the back 4thereof, as prescribed in Section 16-6 of this Act, shall be 5plainly visible to the voter, and in this fashion the ballots 6shall be handed to the voter by the judge. 7    Immediately after voting, the voter shall be instructed 8whether the voting equipment, if used, accepted or rejected 9the ballot or identified the ballot as under-voted. A voter 10whose ballot is identified as under-voted for a statewide 11constitutional office may return to the voting booth and 12complete the voting of that ballot. A voter whose ballot is not 13accepted by the voting equipment may, upon surrendering the 14ballot, request and vote another ballot. The voter's 15surrendered ballot shall be initialed by the election judge 16and handled as provided in the appropriate Article governing 17that voting equipment.18    The voter shall, upon quitting the voting booth, deliver 19to one of the judges of election all of the ballots, properly 20folded, which he received. The judge of election to whom the 21voter delivers his ballots shall not accept the same unless 22all of the ballots given to the voter are returned by him. If a 23voter delivers less than all of the ballots given to him, the 24judge to whom the same are offered shall advise him in a voice 25clearly audible to the other judges of election that the voter 26must return the remainder of the ballots. The statement of the   HB5126- 11 -LRB104 18502 SPS 31944 b1judge to the voter shall clearly express the fact that the 2voter is not required to vote such remaining ballots but that 3whether or not he votes them he must fold and deliver them to 4the judge. In making such statement the judge of election 5shall not indicate by word, gesture or intonation of voice 6that the unreturned ballots shall be voted in any particular 7manner. No new voter shall be permitted to enter the voting 8booth of a voter who has failed to deliver the total number of 9ballots received by him until such voter has returned to the 10voting booth pursuant to the judge's request and again quit 11the booth with all of the ballots required to be returned by 12him. Upon receipt of all such ballots the judges of election 13shall enter the name of the voter, and his number, as above 14provided in this Section, and the judge to whom the ballots are 15delivered shall immediately put the ballots into the ballot 16box. If any voter who has failed to deliver all the ballots 17received by him refuses to return to the voting booth after 18being advised by the judge of election as herein provided, the 19judge shall inform the other judges of such refusal, and 20thereupon the ballot or ballots returned to the judge shall be 21deposited in the ballot box, the voter shall be permitted to 22depart from the polling place, and a new voter shall be 23permitted to enter the voting booth. 24    The judge of election who receives the ballot or ballots 25from the voter shall announce the residence and name of such 26voter in a loud voice. The judge shall put the ballot or   HB5126- 12 -LRB104 18502 SPS 31944 b1ballots received from the voter into the ballot box in the 2presence of the voter and the judges of election, and in plain 3view of the public. The judges having charge of such registers 4shall then, in a column prepared thereon, in the same line of, 5the name of the voter, mark "Voted" or the letter "V". 6    No judge of election shall accept from any voter less than 7the full number of ballots received by such voter without 8first advising the voter in the manner above provided of the 9necessity of returning all of the ballots, nor shall any such 10judge advise such voter in a manner contrary to that which is 11herein permitted, or in any other manner violate the 12provisions of this Section; provided, that the acceptance by a 13judge of election of less than the full number of ballots 14delivered to a voter who refuses to return to the voting booth 15after being properly advised by such judge shall not be a 16violation of this Section. 17(Source: P.A. 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15.) 18    (10 ILCS 5/19A-35)19    Sec. 19A-35. Procedure for voting.20    (a) Not more than 23 days before the start of the election, 21the county clerk shall make available to the election official 22conducting early voting by personal appearance a sufficient 23number of early ballots, envelopes, and printed voting 24instruction slips for the use of early voters. The election 25official shall receipt for all ballots received and shall   HB5126- 13 -LRB104 18502 SPS 31944 b1return unused or spoiled ballots at the close of the early 2voting period to the county clerk and must strictly account 3for all ballots received. The ballots delivered to the 4election official must include early ballots for each precinct 5in the election authority's jurisdiction and must include 6separate ballots for each political subdivision conducting an 7election of officers or a referendum at that election.8    (b) In conducting early voting under this Article, the 9election judge or official is required to verify the signature 10of the early voter by comparison with the signature on the 11official registration card, and the judge or official must 12verify (i) that the applicant is a registered voter, (ii) the 13precinct in which the applicant is registered, and (iii) the 14proper ballots of the political subdivision in which the 15applicant resides and is entitled to vote before providing an 16early ballot to the applicant. The election judge or official 17must verify the applicant's registration from the most recent 18poll list provided by the election authority, and if the 19applicant is not listed on that poll list, by telephoning the 20office of the election authority.21    (b-5) A person requesting an early voting ballot to whom a 22vote by mail ballot was issued may vote early if the person 23submits that vote by mail ballot to the judges of election or 24official conducting early voting for cancellation. If the 25voter is unable to submit the vote by mail ballot, it shall be 26sufficient for the voter to submit to the judges or official   HB5126- 14 -LRB104 18502 SPS 31944 b1(i) a portion of the vote by mail ballot if the vote by mail 2ballot was torn or mutilated or (ii) an affidavit executed 3before the judges or official specifying that (A) the voter 4never received a vote by mail ballot, or (B) the voter 5completed and returned a vote by mail ballot and was informed 6that the election authority did not receive that vote by mail 7ballot, or (C) the voter received a vote by mail ballot, but 8the vote by mail ballot was misplaced or destroyed, and was 9unable to bring the vote by mail ballot to the polling place.10    (b-10) Within one day after a voter casts an early voting 11ballot, the election authority shall transmit the voter's 12name, street address, and precinct, ward, township, and 13district numbers, as the case may be, to the State Board of 14Elections, which shall maintain those names and that 15information in an electronic format on its website, arranged 16by county and accessible to State and local political 17committees.18    (b-15) Immediately after voting an early ballot, the voter 19shall be instructed whether the voting equipment accepted or 20rejected the ballot or identified that ballot as under-voted 21for a statewide constitutional office. A voter whose ballot is 22identified as under-voted may return to the voting booth and 23complete the voting of that ballot. A voter whose early voting 24ballot is not accepted by the voting equipment may, upon 25surrendering the ballot, request and vote another early voting 26ballot. The voter's surrendered ballot shall be initialed by   HB5126- 15 -LRB104 18502 SPS 31944 b1the election judge or official conducting the early voting and 2handled as provided in the appropriate Article governing the 3voting equipment used. 4    (c) The sealed early ballots in their carrier envelope 5shall be delivered by the election authority to the central 6ballot counting location before the close of the polls on the 7day of the election. 8(Source: P.A. 98-691, eff. 7-1-14; 98-1171, eff. 6-1-15.)